District of Columbia statutes.
21-513

Hospitalization of nonprotesting persons.

A friend or relative of a person believed to have a mental illness may apply on behalf of that person to the admitting psychiatrist or the admitting qualified psychologist of a hospital by presenting the person, together with a referral from a practicing physician or qualified psychologist. For the purpose of examination and treatment, a private hospital may accept a person so presented and referred, and a public hospital shall accept a person so presented and referred, if, in the judgment of the admitting psychiatrist or the admitting qualified psychologist, the need for examination and treatment is indicated on the basis of the person’s mental condition and the person signs a statement at the time of the admission stating that he does not object to hospitalization. The statement shall contain in simple, nontechnical language the fact that the person is to be hospitalized and a description of the right to release set out in section 21-514 . The admitting psychiatrist or the admitting qualified psychologist may admit a person so presented, without referral from a practicing physician or qualified psychologist, if the need for an immediate admission is apparent to the admitting psychiatrist or the admitting qualified psychologist upon preliminary examination.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 753, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 11(a)(7), 30 DCR 5778
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 35(a)(2), 53 DCR 6198
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “have” for “be suffering from”.
1973 Ed., § 21-513.
1981 Ed., § 21-513.
This section is referenced in § 21-514.